Massachusetts, session 194th, S523.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of Chapter 55A of the General Laws as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition is hereby amended by striking the language of the following definition of
“Statewide elective office” in its entirety and replacing it with the following definition :-
''Statewide elective office'', the office of governor, lieutenant-governor, attorney general,
secretary, treasurer and receiver general, auditor, senator in general court, and representative in
general court.
SECTION 2. Section 1A of Chapter 55A of the General Laws as so appearing is hereby
amended by striking the section in its entirety and replacing it with the following section :-
Section 1A. (a) On or before the last day for filing that candidate's nomination papers
with the state secretary pursuant to chapter 53, every candidate for statewide elective office shall
file with the director a statement, in a form prescribed by the director, that the candidate does or
does not agree:
of 10

in the case of primary candidates, to abide by the following limits on expenditures for the
following elective offices in the campaign for the state primary:
Governor $1,000,000
Lieutenant Governor $500,000
Attorney General $500,000
Secretary $500,000
Treasurer and Receiver General $500,000
Auditor $500,000
Senator in General Court $150,000
Representative in General Court $75,000; and
in the case of all candidates for statewide elective office, to abide by the following limits
on expenditures for the following elective offices in the campaign for the state election:
Governor and Lieutenant Governor $1,500,000
Attorney General $500,000
Secretary $500,000
Treasurer and Receiver General $500,000
Auditor $500,000
Senator in General Court $150,000
of 10

Representative in General Court $75,000
The name of a candidate who fails to file any statement within the time required by this
subsection shall not appear on the state primary ballot nor on the state election ballot, and the
director shall inform the state secretary of any such failure.
(b) On or before the last day for filing withdrawals of nominations for the state primary,
every primary candidate for statewide office who has not agreed to abide by the expenditure
limit under subsection (a), and who is opposed in that primary by 1 or more candidates who have
agreed to this limit, shall file with the director a statement, in a form prescribed by the director,
of the maximum amount of expenditures to be made in his campaign for that primary. The name
of a candidate who fails to file a statement required by this subsection within the time so required
shall not appear on the state primary ballot, and the director shall inform the state secretary of
any such failure. The state primary campaign expenditure limit agreed to under subsection (a) by
any candidate shall be increased to the highest amount stated under this subsection by any
opposing candidate who has not agreed to this limit.
(c) On or before the last day for filing withdrawals of nominations made at the state
primary, every candidate for statewide office in the state election who has not agreed to abide by
the expenditure limit under subsection (a), and who is opposed in that election by 1 or more
candidates who have agreed to this limit, shall file with the director a statement, in a form
prescribed by the director, of the maximum amount of expenditures to be made in his campaign
for that primary. The name of a candidate who fails to file a statement required by this subsection
within the time so required shall not appear on the state election ballot, and the director shall
inform the state secretary of any such failure. The state election campaign expenditure limit
of 10

agreed to under subsection (a) by any candidate shall be increased to the highest amount stated
under this subsection by any opposing candidate who has not agreed to this limit.
(d) Any candidate appointed to fill a vacancy in a nomination for statewide elective office
shall file the statement required by subsection (a) not later than the last day for filing the
certificate of nomination to fill such vacancy. The time for opposing candidates to file the
statements required by subsection (b) or (c), as the case may be, shall be extended accordingly.
(e) Any candidate who files a statement with the director under this section and who
makes expenditures in excess of the limit established by this section, or in excess of the amount
stated by said candidate pursuant to subsection (b) or (c), shall be punished by a fine of not more
than the total of 2 times the amount of the expenditures in excess of said limit or said amount, as
the case may be, in addition to the penalties provided by section 12.
SECTION 3. Section 4 of Chapter 55A of the General Laws as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition is hereby amended by striking the section in its entirety and replacing it with the
following section :-
Section 4. Any candidate for statewide elective office certified by the state secretary
under section 2 as qualifying for the ballot and having opposition in primary election shall be
eligible to receive limited public financing of his primary election campaign, to the extent
provided by section 5, on determination and certification by the director that the candidate (a)
has filed a request for public financing with the director together with the bond required by
section 8; (b) has filed with the director a statement under subsection (a) of section 1A agreeing
to abide by the expenditure limits provided thereby; and (c) has received qualifying contributions
of 10

as defined by section 1 in at least the following minimum amounts for the following statewide
elective offices:
Governor $250,000
Lieutenant Governor $150,000
Attorney General $150,000
Secretary $150,000
Treasurer and Receiver General $150,000
Auditor $150,000
Senator in General Court $50,000
Representative in General Court $25,000
Only amounts appearing in statements of qualifying contributions filed with the director,
in such form as he shall prescribe, shall be considered in determining whether any such
minimum amount has been met. Determination and certification of the eligibility of candidates
shall be made by the director on the eighth Tuesday before the primary and shall be based solely
upon information contained in such statements as have been filed by candidates. Candidates for
governor seeking public financing shall file the statement on or before the Friday that is 11 days
preceding said eighth Tuesday and other candidates seeking public financing shall file said
statements on or before the Friday next preceding said eighth Tuesday.
of 10

SECTION 3. Section 5 of Chapter 55A of the General Laws as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition is hereby amended by striking the section in its entirety and replacing it with the
following section :-
Section 5. Any candidate eligible to receive limited public financing of his primary
election campaign shall, on determination and certification by the director, be entitled to an
amount equal to $1 for each one dollar of qualifying contributions as defined by section 1,
subject to the following limitations: (a) no candidate shall be entitled to receive any amount in
excess of the balance then remaining in the primary candidate account established for that
100 candidate under section 42 of chapter 10; (b) nor shall any candidate be entitled to receive any
101 amount in excess of the following maximum amounts for the following statewide elective
102 offices:
103 Governor $1,000,000
104 Lieutenant Governor $500,000
105 Attorney General $500,000
106 Secretary $500,000
107 Treasurer and Receiver General $500,000
108 Auditor $500,000
109 Senator in General Court $150,000
110 Representative in General Court $75,000
of 10

111 Only amounts appearing in statements of qualifying contributions filed with the director,
112 in such form as he shall prescribe, shall be considered in determining amounts to which
113 candidates are entitled. Determinations and certifications of the amounts to which eligible
114 candidates are entitled shall be made by the director on or before the eighth, sixth, fourth and
115 second Tuesday before the primary election and shall be based solely upon information
116 contained in such statements as have been filed prior to such dates.
117 SECTION 5. Section 6 of Chapter 55A of the General Laws as appearing in the 2022
118 Official Edition is hereby amended by striking the section in its entirety and replacing it with the
119 following section :-
120 Section 6. Any candidate for statewide elective office certified by the state secretary
121 under section two as qualifying for the ballot and having opposition in the state election shall be
122 eligible to receive limited public financing of his state election campaign, to the extent provided
123 by section 7, on determination and certification by the director that the candidate (a) has filed a
124 request for public financing with the director together with the bond required by section 8; (b)
125 has filed with the director a statement under subsection (a) of section 1A agreeing to abide by the
126 expenditure limits provided thereby; and (c) has received qualifying contributions as defined by
127 section 1 in at least the following minimum amounts for the following statewide elective offices:
128 Governor and Lieutenant Governor $250,000
129 Attorney General $150,000
130 Secretary $150,000
131 Treasurer and Receiver General $150,000
of 10

132 Auditor $150,000
133 Senator in General Court $100,000
134 Representative in General Court $50,000
135 Only amounts appearing in statements of qualifying contributions filed with the director,
136 in such form as he shall prescribe, shall be considered in determining whether any such
137 minimum amount has been met. Determination and certification of the eligibility of candidates
138 shall be made by the director on the fourth Tuesday before the state election and shall be based
139 solely upon information contained in such statements as have been filed by candidates.
140 Candidates for governor and lieutenant governor seeking public financing shall file the statement
141 on or before the Friday that is 11 days preceding said fourth Tuesday and other candidates
142 seeking public financing shall file said statements on or before the Friday next preceding said
143 fourth Tuesday.
144 The fact that a qualifying contribution has previously been considered in determining
145 eligibility for, or the extent of, public financing of a candidate's primary election campaign shall
146 not prevent consideration of the same contribution in determining eligibility for public financing
147 of such candidate's state election campaign.
148 SECTION 5. Section 7 of Chapter 55A of the General Laws as appearing in the 2022
149 Official Edition is hereby amended by striking the section in its entirety and replacing it with the
150 following section :-
151 Section 7. Any candidate eligible to receive limited public financing of his state election
152 campaign shall, on determination and certification by the director, be entitled to an amount equal
of 10

153 to $1 for each one dollar of qualifying contributions as defined by section one subject to section
154 nine and subject to the following limitations: (a) no candidate shall be entitled to receive any
155 amount in excess of the balance then remaining in the state election candidate account
156 established for that candidate under section 43 of chapter 10; (b) nor shall any candidate be
157 entitled to receive any amount in excess of the following maximum amounts for the following
158 statewide elective offices:
159 Governor and Lieutenant Governor $1,000,000
160 Attorney General $500,000
161 Secretary $500,000
162 Treasurer and Receiver General $500,000
163 Auditor $500,000
164 Senator in General Court $150,000
165 Representative in General Court $100,000
166 Only amounts appearing in statements of qualifying contributions filed with the director,
167 in such form as he shall prescribe, shall be considered in determining amounts to which
168 candidates are entitled. Determinations and certifications of the amounts to which eligible
169 candidates are entitled shall be made by the director on or before the fourth and second Tuesday
170 before the state election and shall be based solely upon information contained in such statements
171 as have been filed prior to such dates.
of 10

172 The fact that a qualifying contribution has previously been considered in determining
173 eligibility for, or the extent of, public financing of a candidate's primary election campaign shall
174 not prevent consideration of the same contribution in determining the extent of public financing
175 of such candidate's state election campaign.
of 10